Oklahoma, session 2025, SB829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 101, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 101. The district court may grant a divorce for any of


the following causes:


First. Abandonment including: desertion for one (1) year,


habitual drunkenness, gross neglect of duty, or insanity for a


period of five (5) years. In the case of insanity, the person must

Req. No. 1343 Page 1


have been admitted to a state institution for the insane in this


state or another state or a private sanitarium and received a poor


prognosis for recovery. No divorce shall be granted by reason of


insanity before a thorough examination of the insane person is


conducted by three physicians, one of whom shall be a superintendent


of a state institution or sanitarium in which the insane person was


admitted, and the other two shall be appointed by the court. If any


two of the three physicians agree that such insane person, at the


time the petition in the divorce action is filed, has a poor


prognosis for recovery, a divorce shall be granted; however, no


divorce shall be granted based on the provisions of this section to


any person whose husband or wife is an inmate of a state institution


in another state unless the person applying for such divorce shall


have been a resident of this state for at least five (5) years prior


to the commencement of a divorce action. A decree granted based on


the provisions of this section shall not relieve the successful


party from contributing to the support and maintenance of the


defendant. The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent


the insane defendant, whose appointment shall be made at least ten


(10) days before any decree is entered.


Second. Adultery.


Third. Impotency.


Fourth. Unknown pregnancy. When the wife at the time of her


marriage was pregnant by another than her husband unbeknownst to

Req. No. 1343 Page 2


him, or when the husband at the time of his marriage had impregnated


another woman other than his wife unbeknownst to her.


Fifth. Fourth. Extreme cruelty.


Sixth. Fifth. Fraudulent contract.


Seventh. Incompatibility. Provided, however, where the


interest of a child under eighteen (18) years of age is involved,


the adult parties shall attend an educational program concerning the


impact of divorce on children as provided in subsection B of Section


107.2 of this title.


Eighth. Habitual drunkenness.


Ninth. Gross neglect of duty.


Tenth. Imprisonment of the other party in a state or federal


penal institution under sentence thereto for the commission of a


felony at the time the petition is filed.


Eleventh. Sixth. The procurement of a final divorce decree


without this state by a husband or wife which does not in this state


release the other party from the obligations of the marriage.


Twelfth. Insanity for a period of five (5) years, the insane


person having been an inmate of a state institution for the insane


in the State of Oklahoma, or inmate of a state institution for the


insane in some other state for such period, or of a private


sanitarium, and affected with a type of insanity with a poor


prognosis for recovery; provided, that no divorce shall be granted


because of insanity until after a thorough examination of such

Req. No. 1343 Page 3


insane person by three physicians, one of whom shall be a


superintendent of the hospital or sanitarium for the insane in which


the insane defendant is confined, and the other two to be appointed


by the court before whom the action is pending, and any two of such


physicians shall agree that such insane person, at the time the


petition in the divorce action is filed, has a poor prognosis for


recovery; provided, further, however, that no divorce shall be


granted on this ground to any person whose husband or wife is an


inmate of a state institution in any other than the State of


Oklahoma, unless the person applying for such divorce shall have


been a resident of the State of Oklahoma for at least five (5) years


prior to the commencement of an action; and provided further, that a


decree granted on this ground shall not relieve the successful party


from contributing to the support and maintenance of the defendant.


The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the insane


defendant, which appointment shall be made at least ten (10) days


before any decree is entered.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 107.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 107.2. A. Except as provided in subsection B of this


section, in In all actions for divorce, separate maintenance,


guardianship, paternity, custody, or visitation, including


modifications or enforcements of a prior court order, where the


interest of a child under eighteen (18) years of age is involved,

Req. No. 1343 Page 4


the court may require all adult parties to attend an educational


program concerning, as appropriate, the impact of separate parenting


and coparenting on children, the implications for visitation and


conflict management, development of children, separate financial


responsibility for children, and such other instruction as deemed


necessary by the court. The program shall be educational in nature


and not designed for individual therapy.


B. In actions for divorce based upon incompatibility filed on


or after November 1, 2014, where the interest of a child under


eighteen (18) years of age is involved, the adult parties shall


attend, either separately or together, an educational program


concerning the impact of divorce on children. The An educational


program shall include the following components:


1. Short-term and longitudinal effects of divorce on child


well-being;


2. Reconciliation as an optional outcome;


3. Effects of family violence;


4. Potential child behaviors and emotional states during and


after divorce including information on how to respond to the child’s


needs;


5. Communication strategies to reduce conflict and facilitate


cooperative coparenting; and


6. Area resources, including, but not limited to, nonprofit


organizations or religious entities available to address issues of

Req. No. 1343 Page 5


substance abuse or other addictions, family violence, behavioral


health, individual and couples counseling, and financial planning.


Program attendees shall be required to pay a fee of not less than


Ten Dollars ($10.00) and not more than Sixty Dollars ($60.00) to the


program provider to offset the costs of the program. The fee may be


waived by the court if an attendee uses a qualified program that is


provided free of charge. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a


third party from paying the fee to the program provider for an


attendee. A certificate of completion shall be issued upon


satisfying the attendance and fee requirements of the program, and


the certificate of completion shall be filed with the court. The


program provider shall carry general liability insurance and


maintain an accurate accounting of all business transactions and


funds received in relation to the program. The program shall be


completed prior to the temporary order or within forty-five (45)


days of receiving a temporary order. However, and in all events, a


final disposition of child custody shall not be granted until the


parties complete the program required by this subsection. The court


may waive attendance of the program for good cause shown which shall


include, but not be limited to, where domestic violence, stalking,


or harassment as defined by paragraph 2 of subsection I of Section


109 of this title occurred during the marriage.


C. Each judicial district may adopt its own local rules


governing the programs.

Req. No. 1343 Page 6


D. The Administrative Office of the Courts may enter into a


memorandum of understanding with a state entity or other


organization in order to compile data including, but not limited to,


the number of actions for divorce that were dismissed after


participating in the program, the number of programs that were


completed, and the number of program participants for each fiscal


year. The report shall include data collected from each judicial


district. The report shall be published on the Administrative


Office of the Courts website and electronically distributed to the


Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Minority Leader


of the House of Representatives, President Pro Tempore of the


Senate, and Minority Leader of the Senate.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 121, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 121. A. When a dissolution of marriage is granted, the


decree shall restore:


1. To the wife her maiden or former name, if her name was


changed as a result of the marriage and if she so desires; and


2. To the husband his former name, if his name was changed as a


result of the marriage and if he so desires.


B. The court shall enter its decree confirming in each spouse


the property owned by him or her before marriage and the undisposed-


of property acquired after marriage by him or her in his or her own


right. Either spouse may be allowed such alimony out of real and

Req. No. 1343 Page 7


personal property of the other as the court shall think reasonable,


having due regard to the value of such property at the time of the


dissolution of marriage. Alimony may be allowed from real or


personal property, or both, or in the form of money judgment,


payable either in gross or in installments, as the court may deem


just and equitable. As to such property, whether real or personal,


which has been acquired by the parties jointly during their


marriage, whether the title thereto be in either or both of said the


parties, the court shall, subject to a valid antenuptial contract in


writing, make such division between the parties as may appear just


and reasonable, by a division of the property in kind, or by setting


the same apart to one of the parties, and requiring the other


thereof to be paid such sum as may be just and proper to effect a


fair and just division thereof. The court may set apart a portion


of the separate estate of a spouse to the other spouse for the


support of the children of the marriage where custody resides with


that spouse. In all orders entered pursuant to this section, the


court shall consider the degree of harm caused by a party, or both


parties, held at fault for the dissolution of the marriage.


C. A servicemember’s portion of Special Monthly Compensation


(SMC) awarded by or from the United States Department of Veterans


Affairs for service-connected loss or loss of use of specific organs


or extremities shall be separate property, not divisible as a


marital asset nor as community property. For purposes of

Req. No. 1343 Page 8


identifying SMC, it is the sole responsibility of the servicemember


to prove with competent evidence what amount of his or her


disability compensation is SMC.


D. A servicemember’s portion of Combat-Related Special


Compensation (CRSC) shall be separate property, not divisible as a


marital asset nor as community property, if a specific dollar amount


of CRSC can be proved by the servicemember as compensation for


combat-related loss of limb or loss of bodily function and the CRSC


award was applied for and established prior to the date of the


filing of the dissolution of marriage action.


E. Pursuant to the federal Uniformed Services Former Spouses’


Protection Act, 10 U.S.C., Section 1408, a court may treat


disposable retired or retainer pay payable to a military member


either as property solely of the member or as property of the member


and the spouse of the member. If a state court determines that the


disposable retired or retainer pay of a military member is the sole


and separate property of the military member, the court shall submit


clear and concise written findings of such determination to be


included in the decree or final order. If a state court determines


that the disposable retired or retainer pay of a military member is


marital property, the court shall submit clear and concise written


findings of such determination to be included in the decree or final


order and shall award an amount consistent with the rank, pay grade,


and time of service of the member at the date of the filing of the

Req. No. 1343 Page 9


petition, unless the court finds a more equitable date due to the


economic separation of the parties.


F. Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, any division of


an active duty military member’s retirement or retainer pay shall


use the following language:


“The former spouse is awarded a percentage of the member’s


disposable military retired pay, to be computed by multiplying fifty


percent (50%) times a fraction, the numerator of which is ____x____


months of marriage during the member’s creditable military service,


divided by the member’s total number of months of creditable


military service.”


G. In the case of a member’s retiring from reserve duty, unless


otherwise agreed by the parties, any division of a reservist’s


retirement or retainer pay shall use the following language:


“The former spouse is awarded a percentage of the member’s


disposable military retired pay, to be computed by multiplying fifty


percent (50%) times a fraction, the numerator of which is


__X____reserve retirement points earned during the period of the


marriage, divided by the member’s total number of reserve retirement


points earned.”


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 121.1 of Title 43, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Trust Fund Requirement.

Req. No. 1343 Page 10


In addition to other child support and alimony ordered by the


court, in cases where a divorce is granted on the basis of fault,


the court shall order the at-fault parent to establish a trust fund


for the benefit of each child within the marriage being dissolved.


The trust fund shall be:


1. Established within sixty (60) days of the final divorce


decree;


2. Funded in an amount determined by the court, taking into


account the at-fault parent’s financial capacity and the child’s


needs; and


3. Created with the sole purpose of supporting the child’s


welfare, education, health, and general needs.


B. Executor Prior to the Child Turning Eighteen.


The court shall designate an executor for the trust fund until


the child reaches the age of eighteen (18). The court shall:


1. Give priority to the non-at-fault parent to serve as the


executor of the trust;


2. Assess the fitness and capacity of the non-at-fault parent


to serve in such role, considering factors such as financial


responsibility, moral character, and ability to act in the best


interests of the child; and


3. Retain the discretion to appoint another suitable individual


as executor if the non-at-fault parent is deemed unfit for this


responsibility. Such alternative executors may include:

Req. No. 1343 Page 11


a. a family member,


b. a professional trustee or fiduciary, or


c. another individual or entity deemed appropriate by the


court.


C. Executor Upon the Child Turning Eighteen.


Upon reaching the age of eighteen (18), the child shall


automatically become the sole executor of his or her trust fund,


with full authority to manage and use the funds for his or her


benefit.


D. Restriction on Trust Fund Withdrawals Until the Child


Reaches Age Eighteen.


1. No funds shall be withdrawn from the trust fund until the


child for whom the trust was established reaches the age of eighteen


(18).


2. Funds may only be accessed prior to the child reaching age


eighteen (18) to cover emergency expenses essential to the child’s


immediate health or safety as determined by the court. Such


withdrawals shall be limited to the amount necessary to address the


specific medical or safety emergency.


E. Access Upon Reaching Age Eighteen.


Upon reaching the age of eighteen (18), the child shall gain


full control of his or her respective trust fund and may use the


funds at his or her discretion.


F. Safeguards Against Unauthorized Withdrawals.

Req. No. 1343 Page 12


The trust fund shall be held in a secured account with


restrictions to prevent unauthorized access or withdrawals.


All financial institutions managing the trust fund shall be


provided with a copy of the court order establishing these


restrictions and shall not permit withdrawals without court


authorization. Any attempt to withdraw or access trust fund money


in violation of this section shall result in:


1. Contempt of court proceedings against the violator; and


2. Restitution to the trust fund for any misappropriated


amounts plus additional sanctions up to fifty percent (50%) of the


amount misappropriated as deemed appropriate by the court.


G. Penalties for Noncompliance.


Failure by the at-fault parent to establish or adequately fund


the trust within the specified time frame shall result in:


1. Contempt of court proceedings; and


2. Additional financial penalties as determined by the court.


H. Modification of Executor Designation.


The court reserves the right to modify the designation of the


executor prior to the child turning eighteen (18) based on changes


in circumstances or upon a motion from an interested party, provided


such changes are in the best interests of the child.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1343 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:13 AM

Req. No. 1343 Page 13